src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON 2VAALJA_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N:  X_VAALJA_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^RVSH%>i Rhash ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG^RVSH%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:^WG^RVSH%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:^WG^RVSH%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Com:^WG^RVSH%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Loc:^WG^RVSH%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2JUUHA_PL_DIM ; !kaandâš nieidâš tuulâš XXX
 
 
LEXICON X_VAALJA_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom:^RLEN K ;     ! 
+Sg+Gen:^RLEN K ;     ! 
+Sg+Acc:^RLEN K ;     ! 
+Sg+Ill:^RLEN%>n K ;  ! 
+Sg+Loc:^RLEN%>st K ; ! 
+Sg+Com:^SVLOW%>in K ;           ! 
+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá K ;     !  
+Ess:^RLEN%>n K ;               ! 
+Par:^RLEN%>d K ;               ! 
 
 
LEXICON X_VAALJA_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Nom:^RLEN%>h K ;  ! 
+Pl+Gen:^RLEN%>i K ; 
+Pl+Gen:%>i K ; 
+Pl+Acc:^RLEN%>id K ; 
+Pl+Ill:^SVLOW%>id K ;     ! 
+Pl+Loc:^RLEN%>in K ;     ! 
+Pl+Com:^RVSH%>i GUIN ; 
+Pl+Abe:^RVSH%>ittáá K ; 
 
 
LEXICON 2SKERREEH_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Plural tantum, as 2PUUVSAH, but w/o WG 
C_TAHHEE_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^SV^SLEN Rhash ; 
 
 
!! ### APINA lexicon family 
!! this is for loanwords without stem change 
 
LEXICON APINA !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
APINA_SG ; 
APINA_PL ; 
 
 
LEXICON APINA_SG  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_APINA_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen: Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Nom: VPXsuff12nom ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen: VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc: VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Nom: VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen: VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc: VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Ill:%>s CPXsuff ; ! 
+N+Sg+Loc:%>st CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Com:%>in CPXsuff ;  ! viinijnis 
+N+Ess:%>n CPXsuff ;      ! apinanis 
+N:%> Gen_DER ; 
!+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: APINA_SG_DIM ; ! No apinadim

LEXICON APINA_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_h_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:%>i Rhash ; 
+N+Pl+Loc:%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Gen:%>id CPXsuff ;  ! viinijdis 
+N+Pl+Acc:%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Com:%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
!+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: APINA_PL_DIM ; ! No apinadim
 
 
LEXICON X_APINA_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** (common for different POS) 
+Sg+Nom: K ;               ! apina 
+Sg+Gen: K ;               ! apina 
+Sg+Acc: K ;               ! apina 
+Sg+Ill:%>n K ;            ! apinan 
+Sg+Loc:%>st K ;           ! apinast 
+Sg+Com:%>i5n K ;          ! apinain 
+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá K ;         ! apinattáá 
+Ess:%>n K ;               ! apinan 
+Par:%>d K ;               ! apinad 
 
LEXICON X_h_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@**  gives %>h etc. to vowel stems, pointong to notILL 
+Pl+Ill:%>id K ;                 ! apinaid 
X_h_PL_notILL ; 
 
LEXICON X_h_PL_notILL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Nom:%>h K ;            ! apinah 
+Pl+Gen:%>i K ;            ! apinai 
+Pl+Acc:%>id K ;           ! apinaid 
+Pl+Loc:%>in K ;           ! apinain 
+Pl+Com:%>i GUIN ;         ! apinaiguin 
+Pl+Abe:%>ittáá K ;        ! apinaittáá 
 
 
 
 
!! ## Four-syllable (even) stem lexica
!    =================================
 
 
!! ### 4KUNAGAS lexicon family 
 
LEXICON 4KUNAGAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
4KUNAGAS_SG ; 
4KUNAGAS_PL ; 
 
 
LEXICON X_KUNAGAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** stem: kunâgâss
X_KUNAGAS_SG ; 
X_KUNAGAS_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 4KUNAGAS_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_KUNAGAS ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^FCD%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^FCD%> Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Nom:^FCD%>â VPXsuff12nom ; ! kunâgâsâd     
+N+Sg+Acc:^FCD%>â VPXsuff12 ;        
+N+Sg+Acc:^FCD%>â VPXsuff3 ;     ! kunâgâsâs   
+N+Sg+Gen:^FCD%>â VPXsuff12 ;    ! kunâgâssân   
+N+Sg+Gen:^FCD%>â VPXsuff3 ;     ! kunâgâsâs 
+N+Sg+Ill: CPXsuff ;             ! kunâgâssis 
+N+Sg+Loc:^FCD%>âst CPXsuff ;    ! kunâgâsâstâd     
+N+Sg+Com:^FCD%>âin CPXsuff ;    ! kunâgâsâinâd 
+N+Ess:^FCD%>n CPXsuff ;         ! kunâgâsnâd 
+N:^FCD%> Nom_DER ; 
+N:^FCD%> Gen_DER ; !njuolgâduslâš 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 4KUNAGAS_SG_DIM ;
 
LEXICON 4KUNAGAS_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** > 
+N: X_KUNAGAS_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^FCD%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^FCD%>âi Rhash ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:^FCD%>âid CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:^FCD%>âid CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:^FCD%>âid CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Loc:^FCD%>âin CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Com:^FCD%>âid CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 4KUNAGAS_PL_DIM ;
 
LEXICON X_KUNAGAS_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@**  this is for loanwords without stem change, 3-syll. cons end 
+Sg+Nom:^FCD K ;            ! kunâgâs 
+Sg+Gen:^FCD K ;            ! kunâgâs 
+Sg+Acc:^FCD K ;            ! kunâgâs 
+Sg+Ill:^FCD%>ân K ;        ! kunâgâsân 
+Sg+Loc:^FCD%>âst K ;       ! kunâgâsâst 
+Sg+Com:%>áin K ;           ! kunâgâssáin 
+Sg+Abe:^FCD%>ttáá K ;      ! kunâgâsttáá 
+Ess:%>ân K ;               ! kunâgâssân 
+Par:%>âd K ;               ! kunâgâssâd 
 
LEXICON X_KUNAGAS_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Nom:^FCD%>ah K ;            ! kunâgâsah 
+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:^FCD%>eh K ;   ! tábáhtuseh 
+Pl+Gen:^FCD%>âi K ;            ! kunâgâsâi 
+Pl+Acc:^FCD%>âid K ;           ! kunâgâsâid 
+Pl+Ill:%>áid K ;               ! kunâgâssáid 
+Pl+Loc:^FCD%>âin K ;           ! kunâgâsâin 
+Pl+Com:^FCD%>âi GUIN ;         ! kunâgâsâiguin 
+Pl+Abe:^FCD%>âittáá K ;        ! kunâgâsâittáá 
 
 
!! ### 4CAHALIG lexicon family 
 
LEXICON 4CAHALIG  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 4CAHALIG_SG ; 
 4CAHALIG_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 4CAHALIG_SG  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_CAHALIG_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen: Rhash ; 
+N:%> Nom_DER ; 
+N:%> Gen_DER ; 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin:g%>áá 4C_RASTAGAS_SG ; ! 
+N+Sg+Nom:g%>áá VPXsuff12nom ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen:g%>áá VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:g%>áá VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Nom:g%>ee VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen:g%>ee VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:g%>ee VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Ill:g%>ás CPXsuff ; ! 
+N+Sg+Loc:g%>est CPXsuff ; ! 
+N+Sg+Com:%>ijn CPXsuff ;  ! 
 
 
LEXICON 4CAHALIG_PL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_eh_PL ; 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin:g%>áá 4C_RASTAGAS_PL ; !kieđâš 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:%>ij Rhash ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:%>ijd CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:%>ijd CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:%>ijd CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Loc:%>ijn CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Com:%>ijd CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
 
 
LEXICON X_CAHALIG_SG  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom: K ;              ! čáhálig 
+Sg+Gen: K ;                    ! čáhálig   
+Sg+Acc: K ;              ! čáhálig 
+Sg+Ill:%>án K ;                     ! čáháligán 
+Sg+Loc:%>geest K ;                   ! čáháliggeest 
+Sg+Com:%>gáin K ;                         ! čáháliggáin 
+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá K ;                   ! čáháligttáá 
+Ess:%>gen K ;                        ! čáháliggen   
+Ess:%>gen CPXsuff ;                        ! čáháliggen   
+Par:%>ged K ;                       ! čáháligged    
 
LEXICON X_eh_PL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Nom:%>eh K ;                    ! čáháligeh 
+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>ih K ;          ! adverbiaalih, hormonih 
+Pl+Gen:%>ij K ;                  ! čáháligij 
+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;                   ! čáháligijd    
+Pl+Ill:%>áid K ;                 ! čáháligáid 
+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;                 ! čáháligijn 
+Pl+Com:%>ij GUIN ;            ! čáháligijguin 
+Pl+Abe:%>ijttáá K ;            ! čáháligijttáá 
 
!! ### 4MANUTTEP lexicon family 
 
LEXICON 4MANUTTEP   !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
4MANUTTEP_SG ; 
4MANUTTEP_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 4MANUTTEP_SG   !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_MANUTTEP_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:e Rhash ; 
+N+Ess:eppee%>n                CPXsuff ;                        ! mánutteppen 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:ep%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:eve%> Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Nom:epp%>ee VPXsuff12nom ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen:epp%>ee VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:epp%>ee VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Nom:epp%>ee VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen:epp%>ee VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:epp%>ee VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Ill:iäpp%>ás CPXsuff ; ! 
+N+Sg+Loc:ev%>est CPXsuff ; ! 
+N+Sg+Com:ev%>ijn CPXsuff ;  ! 
 
 
LEXICON 4MANUTTEP_PL   !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_MANUTTEP_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:evi%>j Rhash ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:ev%>ijd CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:ev%>ijd CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:ev%>ijd CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Loc:ev%>ijn CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Com:ev%>ijd CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
 
 
