src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx !!≈ * **@CODE@** here we put all normal nouns, as before
fleese+Sem/Dummytag:fleese APINA "" ;
ráávuh+Sem/Dummytag:ráávu APINA_PL "" ;
hávdájááh+Sem/Dummytag:hávdájá 2SKERREEH_PL "" ;
kovoldâs+Sem/Dummytag:kovoldâss 4KUNAGAS "" ;
arvâlâs+Sem/Dummytag:arvâlâss 4KUNAGAS "" ;
čuámáttâs+Sem/Dummytag:čuámáttâss 4KUNAGAS "" ;
setitábáhtus+Sem/Dummytag:seti#tábáhtuss 4KUNAGAS "" ;
najâmuš+Sem/Dummytag:najâmušš 4KUNAGAS "" ;
akatemia+Sem/Dummytag:akatemia APINA "akatemia" ;
čáhálig+Sem/Hum:čáhálig 4CAHALIG "aarteenvartija" ;
kujá+Sem/Dummytag:kujá APINA "kuja" ;
pyessinjâš+Sem/Dummytag:pyessinjâšš 4KUNAGAS "kuohupaikka" ;
tubdâmušah+Sem/Dummytag:tubdâmušš 4KUNAGAS_PL "tunnelma" ;
trauma+Sem/Dummytag:trauma APINA "trauma" ;
sajattâhkaava+Sem/Dummytag:sajattâh#kaava APINA "asemakaava" ;
mieskâttâsah+Sem/Dummytag:mieskâttâss 4KUNAGAS_PL "karike" ;
jieškuástádâs+Sem/Dummytag:jieš#kuástádâss 4KUNAGAS "omakustanne" ;
kevtteetili+Sem/Dummytag:kevttee#tili APINA "käyttäjätili" ;
myytti+Sem/Dummytag:myytti APINA "myytti" ;
luáppijááh+Sem/Dummytag:luáppijá 2SKERREEH_PL "loppiainen" ;
olgoldâs+Sem/Dummytag:olgoldâss 4KUNAGAS "ulkonainen" ;
rotaatio+Sem/Dummytag:rotaatio APINA "rotaatio" ;
čäcilig+Sem/Dummytag:čäcilig 4CAHALIG "vesilisko" ;
täžilig+Sem/Dummytag:täžilig 4CAHALIG "sisilisko" ;
euroviisuh+Sem/Dummytag:euroviisu APINA_PL "euroviisut" ;
aalmugruno+Sem/Dummytag:aalmug#runo APINA "kansanruno" ;
ovdâstâs+Sem/Dummytag:ovdâstâss 4KUNAGAS "edustusto" ;
tuolbâjolgâdâs+Sem/Dummytag:tuolbâ#jolgâdâss 4KUNAGAS "lakeus" ;
vaigârdâs+Sem/Dummytag:vai4gârdâss 4KUNAGAS "vaikerrus" ;
aalmugčuovviittâs+Sem/Dummytag:aalmug#čuovviittâss 4KUNAGAS "kansanvalistus" ;
áámmátovtâstus+Sem/Dummytag:áámmát#ovtâstuss 4KUNAGAS "ammattiyhdistys" ;
raiđâlâsah+Sem/Dummytag:raiđâlâss 4KUNAGAS_PL "tikkaat" ;
lavdhááh+Sem/Dummytag:lavdhá 2SKERREEH_PL "lauteet" ;
kuovsâkkâsah+Sem/Dummytag:kuovsâkkâss 4KUNAGAS_PL "revontulet" ;
vihkjááh+Sem/Dummytag:vihkjá 2SKERREEH_PL "vihkiäiset" ;
naamijááh+Sem/Dummytag:naamijá 2SKERREEH_PL "naamiaiset" ;
kihlájááh+Sem/Dummytag:kihlájá 2SKERREEH_PL "kihlajaiset" ;
ruvnájááh+Sem/Dummytag:ruvnájá 2SKERREEH_PL "kruunajaiset" ;
havdajááh+Sem/Dummytag:havdajá 2SKERREEH_PL "hautajaiset" ;
ravijááh+Sem/Dummytag:ravijá 2SKERREEH_PL "peijaiset" ;
harjakkááh+Sem/Dummytag:harjakká 2SKERREEH_PL "harjakaiset" ;
kozzâskerreeh+Sem/Tool:kozzâ#skerre 2SKERREEH_PL "sakset" ;
pävirskerreeh+Sem/Tool:pävir#skerre 2SKERREEH_PL "sakset" ;
kägisskerreeh+Sem/Tool:kägis#skerre 2SKERREEH_PL "sakset" ;
skerreeh+Sem/Tool:skerre 2SKERREEH_PL "sakset" ;
juvâlmâsah+Sem/Dummytag:juvâlmâss 4KUNAGAS_PL "juomingit" ;
vaaljah+Sem/Dummytag:vaaljâ 2VAALJA_PL "vaalit" ;
sämitiggevaaljah+Sem/Dummytag:sämitigge#vaaljâ 2VAALJA_PL "saamelaiskäräjävaalit" ;
ovdâskoddevaaljah+Sem/Dummytag:ovdâskodde#vaaljâ 2VAALJA_PL "eduskuntavaalit" ;
čogâlmâsah+Sem/Dummytag:čogâlmâss 4KUNAGAS_PL "kekkerit" ;
jáávuh+Sem/Dummytag:jáávu APINA_PL "jauhot" ;
vuállááh+Sem/Dummytag:vuállá 2SKERREEH_PL "pohjalankut" ;
topârig+Sem/Dummytag:topârig 4CAHALIG "roju" ;
kartografia+Sem/Dummytag:kartografia APINA ;
polygynia+Sem/Dummytag:polygynia APINA ;
detalji+Sem/Dummytag:detalji APINA ;
inflaatio+Sem/Dummytag:inflaatio APINA ;
hirmostažâlig+Sem/Dummytag:hirmos#tažâlig 4CAHALIG ;
kaimârig+Sem/Dummytag:kaimârig 4CAHALIG ;
kejâdep+Sem/Dummytag:kejâd 4MANUTTEP ;
tovhâttep+Sem/Dummytag:tovhâtt 4MANUTTEP ;
kejâttep+Sem/Dummytag:kejâtt 4MANUTTEP ;
časkettep+Sem/Dummytag:časkett 4MANUTTEP ;
vyebdittep+Sem/Dummytag:vyebditt 4MANUTTEP ;
päjittep+Sem/Dummytag:päjitt 4MANUTTEP ;
kašnattâs+Sem/Dummytag:kašnattâss 4KUNAGAS ;
blogi+Sem/Txt:blogi APINA "blogi" ; ! tags_via_apertium
ideologia+Sem/Ideol:ideologia APINA ;  ! tags_via_apertium
iärvádâs+Sem/Semcon:iärvádâss 4KUNAGAS "arvoitus" ;	!¢iärvádâssáin, iärvádâsâst, iärvádâsân, iärvádâs tags_via_apertium
mecciviola+Sem/Plant:mecci#viola APINA ;
mánuttep+Sem/Wthr:mánutt 4MANUTTEP "kuutamo" ;	! YAML¢ mánutteevijn, mánutteeveest, mánuttiäpán, mánutteve tags_via_apertium
porthááh+Sem/Plc:porthá 2SKERREEH_PL "portaat" ; ! tags_via_apertium
ruopsiskoiso+Sem/Plant:ruopsis#koiso APINA "punakoiso" ;
tažâlig+Sem/Ani:tažâlig 4CAHALIG "sisilisko" ;	! YAML tags_via_apertium
tiäđáttâs+Sem/Prod-cogn_Txt:tiäđáttâss 4KUNAGAS "tiedote" ;	!¢tiäđáttâssáin, tiäđáttâsâst, tiäđáttâsân, tiäđáttâs tags_via_apertium
tažilig+Sem/Ani:tažilig 4CAHALIG ;
kuovskâsah:kuovskâss 4KUNAGAS_PL "revontulet" ; 
savâttâsah:savâttâss 4KUNAGAS_PL "" ; 
